District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-217.03

Assistance programs for local business enterprise contractors, disadvantaged business enterprise contractors, and small business enterprise contractors.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 4, 46 DCR 969
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 13(c), 46 DCR 5153
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5846
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(b), 52 DCR 7503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1153.3.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-77, April 5, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2634).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter II-B [1981 Ed.], see notes following § 2-217.01.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-136, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6794).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-184, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9745).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-278, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2019).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).